apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="priarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>priànnu</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>priari</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>priamu</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>priàmu</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>priati</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>priàti</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>pria</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>priate</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>priàssiru</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>priàssiru</l><r>priarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="fidarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>fidànnu</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>fidari</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>fidamu</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fidàmu</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>fidati</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fidàti</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>fida</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fidate</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fidàssiru</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fidàssiru</l><r>fidarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="burlarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>burlànnu</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>burlari</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>burlamu</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>burlàmu</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>burlati</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>burlàti</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>burla</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>burlate</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>burlàssiru</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>burlàssiru</l><r>burlarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="piegarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>piegànnu</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>piegari</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>piegamu</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piegàmu</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>piegati</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piegàti</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>piega</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piegate</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piegàssiru</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>piegàssiru</l><r>piegarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="annigarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>annigànnu</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>annigari</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>annigamu</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annigàmu</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>annigati</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annigàti</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>anniga</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annigate</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annigàssiru</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annigàssiru</l><r>annigarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="dilettarisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>dilettànnu</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettari</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettamu</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettàmu</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettati</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettàti</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>diletta</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettate</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettàssiru</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dilettàssiru</l><r>dilettarisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="priarisi"><i></i><par n="priarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fidarisi"><i></i><par n="fidarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="burlarisi"><i></i><par n="burlarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piegarisi"><i></i><par n="piegarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="annigarisi"><i></i><par n="annigarisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dilettarisi"><i></i><par n="dilettarisi__vblex"/></e>
